South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S537.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1. Chapter 29, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-29-250. No school district or school may adopt any type of grading system that requires a teacher to assign a minimum grade or score that exceeds the student's actual performance. If a school district is found to be in violation of this section, the State Department of Education shall withhold ten percent of the school district's State Aid to Classroom funding. Nothing in this section shall preclude opportunities for revision of student work or the use of credit recovery courses that align with the requirements of the state's Uniform Grading Policy. SECTION 2.   This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----